Washington statutes.
RCW 9.24.050

False report of corporation.

Every director, officer or agent of any corporation or joint stock association, and every person engaged in organizing or promoting any enterprise, who shall knowingly make or publish or concur in making or publishing any written prospectus, report, exhibit or statement of its affairs or pecuniary condition, containing any material statement that is false or exaggerated, is guilty of a class B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than ten years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars.

[ 2003 c 53 s 19; 1992 c 7 s 7; 1909 c 249 s 390; RRS s 2642. Formerly RCW 9.38.040.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Application to mutual savings banks: RCW 32.04.120.